Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 1 Regulation of Hospitals and Related Institutions
31-7-14.
Blood supplies; blood donor storage programs.

When any person is admitted to a medical facility for surgical or medical treatment which has been scheduled in advance, neither the medical facility nor any licensed medical practitioner shall prohibit such person from providing a blood donor or donors to furnish blood which may be needed in such surgery or medical treatment, provided that:

The blood donation will not be detrimental to the donor or the recipient of such blood or any of its components; and

The donation is made not earlier than ten working days before the date of the anticipated transfusion and not later than the evening of the fourth full working day before the date of the anticipated transfusion.

If the person receiving surgical or other medical treatment requires more blood than is furnished by the provided donor or donors, then the medical facility may utilize its regular sources to supply the necessary amount. If less blood than the amount that is furnished by the provided donor or donors is used in the surgery or medical treatment, then the excess blood may be retained by the medical facility or turned over to a community blood bank.

This Code section shall not apply to any emergency surgical or medical treatment.

This Code section shall not apply to any medical facility which does not maintain a system for the collection, processing, and storage of blood and its component parts or to any medical facility which allows through a community blood bank a person to provide a blood donor or donors to furnish blood which may be needed in the person’s surgery or medical treatment.

This Code section shall not apply to any person who is under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections.

A medical facility or licensed medical practitioner providing health care to a person who utilizes the provisions of this Code section shall not be liable in damages for injury or death occurring during or as a result of the medical or surgical treatment if the injury or death results from use of the blood supplied by the donors selected by the patient, unless that facility or practitioner is grossly negligent with regard to such use.

A medical facility or group of medical facilities may organize and operate short-term blood donor storage programs for the purpose of perpetuating a group of donors of a common blood type for emergency and planned surgical needs.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1091, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 1091, § 1 and Ga. L. 1987, p. 1494, § 1 enacted different Code sections designated Code Section 31-7-14. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, the Code section enacted by Ga. 1987, p. 1494, § 1 was redesignated as Code Section 31-7-15.

31-7-15.
Review of professional practices by a peer review committee.

A hospital or ambulatory surgical center shall provide for the review of professional practices in the hospital or ambulatory surgical center for the purpose of reducing morbidity and mortality and for the improvement of the care of patients in the hospital or ambulatory surgical center. This review shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

The quality of the care provided to patients as rendered in the hospital or ambulatory surgical center;

The review of medical treatment and diagnostic and surgical procedures in order to foster safe and adequate treatment of patients in the hospital or ambulatory surgical center; and

The evaluation of medical and health care services or the qualifications and professional competence of persons performing or seeking to perform such services.

The functions required by subsection (a) of this Code section may be performed by a “peer review committee,” defined as a committee of physicians appointed by a state or local or specialty medical society or appointed by the governing board or medical staff of a licensed hospital or ambulatory surgical center or any other organization formed pursuant to state or federal law and engaged by the hospital or ambulatory surgical center for the purpose of performing such functions required by subsection (a) of this Code section.

Compliance with the above provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall constitute a requirement for granting or renewing the permit of a hospital or ambulatory surgical center. The functions required by this Code section shall be carried out under the regulations and supervision of the department.

Proceedings and records conducted or generated in an attempt to comply with the duties imposed by subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be subject to the provisions of either Chapter 14 or Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

Nothing in this or any other Code section shall be deemed to require any hospital or ambulatory surgical center to grant medical staff membership or privileges to any licensed practitioner of the healing arts.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1494, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 1091, § 1 and Ga. L. 1987, p. 1494, § 1 enacted different Code sections designated Code Section 31-7-14. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, the Code section enacted by Ga. 1987, p. 1494, § 1 was redesignated as Code Section 31-7-15.

31-7-16.
Determination or pronouncement of death of patient who died in facility classified as nursing home.

When a patient dies in any facility classified as a nursing home by the department and operating under a permit issued by the department, a physician assistant, a nurse practitioner, or a registered professional nurse licensed in this state and employed by such nursing home at the time of apparent death of such person, in the absence of a physician, may make the determination and pronouncement of the death of said patient; provided, however, that when it appears that a patient died from other than natural causes, only a physician may make the determination or pronouncement of death. Such determination or pronouncement shall be made in writing on a form approved by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1243, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 859, § 3/HB 509; Ga. L. 2017, p. 625, § 1/SB 96.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in the first sentence, inserted “, a nurse practitioner,” near the beginning and deleted “that, when said patient is a registered organ donor, only a physician may make the determination or pronouncement of death; provided, further,” preceding “that when it” near the end.

31-7-17.
Licensure and regulation of hospitals and related institutions transferred to Department of Community Health.

Effective July 1, 2009, all matters relating to the licensure and regulation of hospitals and related institutions pursuant to this article shall be transferred from the Department of Human Resources (now known as the Department of Human Services) to the Department of Community Health.

The Department of Community Health shall succeed to all rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders of the Department of Human Resources that are in effect on June 30, 2009, or scheduled to go into effect on or after July 1, 2009, and which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Community Health pursuant to this Code section and shall further succeed to any rights, privileges, entitlements, obligations, and duties of the Department of Human Resources that are in effect on June 30, 2009, which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Community Health pursuant to this Code section. Such rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders shall remain in effect until amended, repealed, superseded, or nullified by the Department of Community Health by proper authority or as otherwise provided by law.

The rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties of parties to contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions entered into before July 1, 2009, by the Department of Human Resources which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Community Health pursuant to this Code section shall continue to exist; and none of these rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties are impaired or diminished by reason of the transfer of the functions to the Department of Community Health. In all such instances, the Department of Community Health shall be substituted for the Department of Human Resources, and the Department of Community Health shall succeed to the rights and duties under such contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions.

All persons employed by the Department of Human Resources in capacities which relate to the functions transferred to the Department of Community Health pursuant to this Code section on June 30, 2009, shall, on July 1, 2009, become employees of the Department of Community Health in similar capacities, as determined by the commissioner of community health. Such employees shall be subject to the employment practices and policies of the Department of Community Health on and after July 1, 2009, but the compensation and benefits of such transferred employees shall not be reduced as a result of such transfer. Employees who are subject to the rules of the State Personnel Board and who are transferred to the department shall retain all existing rights under such rules. Retirement rights of such transferred employees existing under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or other public retirement systems on June 30, 2009, shall not be impaired or interrupted by the transfer of such employees and membership in any such retirement system shall continue in the same status possessed by the transferred employees on June 30, 2009. Accrued annual and sick leave possessed by said employees on June 30, 2009, shall be retained by said employees as employees of the Department of Community Health.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-14/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-28/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-37/HB 642.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, Code Section 31-7-17, as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 520, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 31-7-18.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

31-7-18.
Vaccinations for Influenza and pneumococcal disease for certain discharged patients;vaccinations or other measures for health care workers and other employees in hospitals; immunity from liability; standing orders.

Prior to discharging any inpatient who is 50 years of age or older, a hospital shall offer the inpatient a vaccination for the influenza virus. Prior to discharging any inpatient who is 65 years of age or older, a hospital shall offer the inpatient a vaccination for pneumococcal disease. Such vaccinations shall be provided in accordance with the recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and any applicable rules and regulations of the department, unless contraindicated and contingent on availability of such vaccine. A hospital may offer other patients such vaccinations in accordance with the recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and any applicable rules and regulations of the department. The vaccinations may be administered pursuant to a standing order that has been approved by the hospital’s medical staff.

A hospital shall annually offer to its health care workers and other employees who have direct contact with patients, at no cost, vaccinations for the influenza virus in accordance with the recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, subject to availability of the vaccine. A hospital may offer to its health care workers and other employees any other vaccination, test, or prophylactic measure required or recommended by, and in accordance with the recommendations of, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. All such vaccinations, tests, or prophylactic measures may be offered or administered pursuant to standing orders approved by the hospital’s medical staff to ensure the safety of employees, patients, visitors, and contractors.

A hospital or health care provider acting in good faith and in accordance with generally accepted health care standards applicable to such hospital or health care provider shall not be subject to administrative, civil, or criminal liability or to discipline for unprofessional conduct for complying with the requirements of this Code section.

Nothing in this Code section shall restrict or limit the use of standing orders in hospitals for any other lawful purpose.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 520, § 1/HB 1105; Ga. L. 2009, p. 184, § 2/HB 217; Ga. L. 2010, p. 529, § 1/HB 1179; Ga. L. 2022, p. 290, § 1/HB 1086.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted the present first three sentences of subsection (a) for the former first sentence, which read: “Prior to discharging any inpatient who is 65 years of age or older, a hospital shall offer the inpatient vaccinations for the influenza virus and pneumococcal disease in accordance with the recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and any applicable rules and regulations of the department, unless contraindicated and contingent on availability of such vaccine.”.

Cross references.

Influenza vaccine protocol agreements, §

43-34-26.1

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, Code Section 31-7-17, as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 520, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 31-7-18.

31-7-19.
Nursing homes to annually offer influenza vaccinations to health care workers and other employees; immunity from liability.

Each nursing home shall annually offer on site to its health care workers and other employees who have direct contact with patients, at no cost, vaccinations for the influenza virus in accordance with the recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, subject to availability of the vaccine. Each nursing home shall keep on record a signed statement from each such health care worker and employee stating that he or she has been offered vaccination against the influenza virus and has either accepted or declined such vaccination. A nursing home may offer to its health care workers and other employees who have direct contact with patients any other vaccination required or recommended by, and in accordance with the recommendations of, the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, which may be offered or administered pursuant to standing orders approved by the nursing home’s medical staff to ensure the safety of employees, patients, visitors, and contractors.

A nursing home or health care provider acting in good faith and in accordance with generally accepted health care standards applicable to such nursing home or health care provider shall not be subject to administrative, civil, or criminal liability or to discipline for unprofessional conduct for complying with the requirements of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 783, § 1/HB 208.

31-7-20.
Medical facilities to make good faith application to southern regional TRICARE managed care support coordinator for certification in the TRICARE program.

Each medical facility in this state shall, not later than July 1, 2015, make a good faith application to the southern regional TRICARE managed care support contractor for certification in the TRICARE program.

If any medical facility fails to qualify for certification in the TRICARE program, such medical facility shall implement a plan to upgrade the facility, equipment, personnel, or such other cause for the disqualification within one year of notice of such deficiency.

Each medical facility shall submit reports to the commissioner detailing its efforts to join the TRICARE program and shall submit copies of applications, acceptances or rejections, correspondences, and any other information the commissioner deems necessary.

The commissioner shall maintain files on each medical facility in this state and shall monitor each medical facility’s efforts to join the TRICARE program.

Nothing in this Code section shall require a medical facility to enter into a contract with the southern regional managed care support contractor or to participate in TRICARE as a network provider or as a participating non-network provider, as such terms are defined in the federal TRICARE regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 83, § 1-1/SB 391.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 224, § 2/SB 130, effective July 1, 2008, repealed this Code section. Former Code Section 31-7-20 was part of former Article 2 of this chapter, relating to the Georgia Building Authority (Hospital), and was based on Ga. L. 1939, p. 144, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 860, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 31.

31-7-21.
Provision of influenza education information to assisted living community residents.

Each assisted living community shall annually provide to each of its residents, no later than September 1 of each year, educational information on influenza disease. Such information shall include, but is not limited to, the risks associated with influenza disease; the availability, effectiveness, and known contraindications of the influenza immunization; causes and symptoms of influenza; and the means in which it is spread. Provision of the appropriate and current Vaccine Information Statement as provided by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention shall be deemed to comply with this subsection.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require an assisted living community to provide or pay for any vaccination against influenza for its residents.

No person shall have a cause of action for any loss or damage caused by any act or omission resulting from providing, or the lack of providing, educational information pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 544, § 1/HB 902.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 224, § 2/SB 130, effective July 1, 2008, repealed this Code section. Former Code Section 31-7-21 was part of former Article 2 of this chapter, relating to the Georgia Building Authority (Hospital), and was based on Ga. L. 1939, p. 144, § 3; Ga. L. 1964, p. 95, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 860, § 2.

31-7-22.
Required publication by hospital of certain documentation on website; updating; penalty for noncompliance; enforcement; individual criminal penalty.

As used in this Code section, the term “hospital” means a nonprofit hospital, a hospital owned or operated by a hospital authority, or a nonprofit corporation formed, created, or operated by or on behalf of a hospital authority.

Beginning October 1, 2019, each hospital in this state shall post a link in a prominent location on the main page of its website to the most recent version of the following documents:

Federal related disclosures:

Copies of audited financial statements that are general purpose financial statements, which express the unqualified opinion of an independent certified public accounting firm for the most recently completed fiscal year for the hospital; each of its affiliates, except those affiliates that were inactive or that had an immaterial amount of total assets; and the hospital’s parent corporation that include the following:

A PDF version of all audited financial statements;

A note in the hospital’s audited financial statements that identifies individual amounts for such hospital’s gross patient revenue, allowances, charity care, and net patient revenue;

Audited consolidated financial statements for hospitals with subsidiaries and consolidating financial statements that at a minimum contain a balance sheet and statement of operations and that provide a breakout of the hospital’s and each subsidiary’s numbers with a report from independent accountants on other financial information; and

Audited consolidated financial statements for the hospital’s parent corporation and consolidating financial statements that at a minimum contain a balance sheet and statement of operations and that provide a breakout of the hospital’s and each affiliate’s numbers with a report from independent accountants on other financial information; and

Copy of audited Internal Revenue Service Form 990, including Schedule H for hospitals and other applicable attachments; provided, however, that for any hospital not required to file IRS Form 990, the department shall establish and provide a form that collects the same information as is contained in Internal Revenue Service Form 990, including Schedule H for hospitals, as applicable; and

Georgia supplemental disclosures:

Copy of the hospital’s completed annual hospital questionnaire, as required by the department;

The community benefit report prepared pursuant to Code Section 31-7-90.1, if applicable;

The disproportionate share hospital survey, if applicable;

Listing of all real property holdings of the hospital, including the location and size, parcel ID number, purchase price, current use, and any improvements made to such property;

Listing of any ownership or interest the nonprofit hospital has in any joint venture, partnership, subsidiary holding company, or captive insurance company; where any such entity is domiciled; and the value of any such ownership or interest;

Listing of any bonded indebtedness, outstanding loans, and bond defaults, whether or not in forbearance; and any bond disclosure sites of the hospital;

A report that identifies by purpose, the ending fund balances of the net assets of the hospital and each affiliate as of the close of the most recently completed fiscal year, distinguishing between donor permanently restricted, donor temporarily restricted, board restricted and unrestricted fund balances. The hospital’s interest in its foundation shall be deducted from the foundation’s total fund balance;

Copy of all going concern statements regarding the hospital;

The most recent legal chart of corporate structure, including the hospital, each of its affiliates and subsidiaries, and its parent corporation, duly dated;

Report listing the salaries and fringe benefits for the ten highest paid administrative positions in the hospital. Each position shall be identified by its complete, unabbreviated title. Fringe benefits shall include all forms of compensation, whether actual or deferred, made to or on behalf of the employee, whether full or part-time;

Evidence of accreditation by accrediting bodies, including, but not limited to, the Joint Commission and DNV; and

Copy of the hospital’s policies regarding the provision of charity care and reduced cost services to the indigent, excluding medical assistance recipients, and its debt collection practices.

Each hospital shall update the documents in the links posted pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section on July 1 of each year or more frequently at its discretion. Noncurrent documents shall remain posted and accessible on the hospital’s website indefinitely.

All documents listed in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, as applicable.

The department shall also post a link in a prominent location on its website to the documents listed in subsection (b) of this Code section for each hospital in this state.

Any hospital that fails to post the documents required pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section within 30 days of the dates required in this Code section shall be suspended from receiving any state funds or any donations pursuant to Code Section 48-7-29.20; provided, however, that the department shall provide a hospital notice of any deficiency and opportunity to correct such deficiency prior to any suspension of funds pursuant to this subsection.

The department shall have jurisdiction to enforce this Code section and to promulgate rules and regulations required to administer this Code section.

Any person who knowingly and willfully includes false, fictitious, or fraudulent information in any documents required to be posted pursuant to this Code section shall be subject to a violation of Code Section 16-10-20.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 183, § 1/HB 321.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 25, 2019.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, the enactment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 1-13/HB 186, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2019, p. 183, § 1/HB 321.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 224, § 2, effective July 1, 2008, repealed this Code section. Former Code Section 31-7-22 was part of former Article 2 of this chapter, relating to the Georgia Building Authority (Hospital), and was based on Ga. L. 1939, p. 144, § 2; Ga. L. 1941, p. 250, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 862, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 417; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1.

31-7-23.
Surgical smoke.

As used in this Code section, the term “surgical smoke” means the gaseous by-product produced from the interaction of tools or heat-producing equipment used for dissection and hemostasis during surgical or invasive procedures.

Each hospital and ambulatory surgical center shall adopt policies for the reduction of human exposure to surgical smoke.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 673, § 1/SB 573.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 31-7-23, which was repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 224, § 2/SB 130, effective July 1, 2008, was part of former Article 2 of this chapter, relating to the Georgia Building Authority (Hospital), and was based on Ga. L. 1939, p. 144, § 4; Ga. L. 1953, p. 357, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18.